Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.080

Theft of livestock in the first degree.

(1) Every person who, with intent to sell or exchange and to deprive or defraud the lawful owner thereof, willfully takes, leads, or transports away, conceals, withholds, slaughters, or otherwise appropriates any horse, mule, cow, heifer, bull, steer, swine, goat, or sheep is guilty of theft of livestock in the first degree.

(2) Theft of livestock in the first degree is a class B felony.

[ 2005 c 419 s 1; 2003 c 53 s 74; 1986 c 257 s 32; 1977 ex.s. c 174 s 2; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.56.080.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Severability—1986 c 257: See note following RCW 9A.56.010.

Effective date—1986 c 257 ss 17-35: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.

Action by owner of damaged or stolen livestock: RCW 4.24.320.